Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.220

Hearings—Vulnerable adult protection orders.

For vulnerable adult protection order hearings, the following also apply.

(1) When a petition for a vulnerable adult protection order is filed by someone other than the vulnerable adult or the vulnerable adult's guardian, conservator, or person acting under a protective arrangement, or both, and the vulnerable adult for whom protection is sought advises the court at the hearing that the vulnerable adult does not want all or part of the protection sought in the petition, then the court may dismiss the petition or the provisions that the vulnerable adult objects to and any existing vulnerable adult protection order, or the court may take additional testimony or evidence, or order additional evidentiary hearings to determine whether the vulnerable adult is unable, due to incapacity, undue influence, or duress, to protect his or her person or estate in connection with the issues raised in the petition or order. If an additional evidentiary hearing is ordered and the court determines that there is reason to believe that there is a genuine issue about whether the vulnerable adult is unable to protect his or her person or estate in connection with the issues raised in the petition or order, the court may issue a temporary protection order of the vulnerable adult pending a decision after the evidentiary hearing.

(2) Pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, an evidentiary hearing on the issue of whether the vulnerable adult is unable, due to incapacity, undue influence, or duress, to protect his or her person or estate in connection with the issues raised in the petition or order, must be held within 14 days of entry of the temporary protection order. If the court did not enter a temporary protection order, the evidentiary hearing must be held within 14 days of the prior hearing on the petition. Notice of the time and place of the evidentiary hearing must be served upon the vulnerable adult and the respondent not less than five judicial days before the hearing. If timely service cannot be made, the court may set a new hearing date. A hearing under this subsection is not necessary if the vulnerable adult has been determined to be subject to a guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective arrangement under chapter 11.130 RCW. If a hearing is scheduled under this subsection, the protection order must remain in effect pending the court's decision at the subsequent hearing.

(3) At the hearing held pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the court shall give the vulnerable adult, the respondent, the petitioner, and, in the court's discretion, other interested persons, the opportunity to testify and submit relevant evidence.

(4) If the court determines that the vulnerable adult is capable of protecting his or her person or estate in connection with the issues raised in the petition, and the vulnerable adult continues to object to the protection order, the court shall dismiss the order or may modify the order if agreed to by the vulnerable adult. If the court determines that the vulnerable adult is not capable of protecting his or her person or estate in connection with the issues raised in the petition or order, and that the vulnerable adult continues to need protection, the court shall order relief consistent with this chapter as it deems necessary for the protection of the vulnerable adult. In the entry of any order that is inconsistent with the expressed wishes of the vulnerable adult, the court's order is governed by the legislative findings contained in RCW 7.105.900.

[ 2021 c 215 s 28.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.